New Jersey, session 221, A2296.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  (New section)  A municipal governing body may, by ordinance, delegate to its municipal clerk the authority to provide, on the governing bodys behalf, a written statement in support of one or more affordable housing programs or projects, or indicating a need for the programs or projects in the municipality, in order to satisfy any other provision of statute or regulation, including but not limited to subsection a. of section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-320) and subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-6), provided that the proposed affordable housing program or project conforms to the provisions of 1[the municipalitys] a municipal1 fair share plan and housing element 1that has been approved through a judgment of repose or compliance, or through another form of judicial or State-level administrative certification1. 2.  Section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-320) is amended to read as follows: 20.  There is established in the Department of Community Affairs a separate trust fund, to be used for the exclusive purposes as provided in this section, and which shall be known as the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund."  The fund shall be a non-lapsing, revolving trust fund, and all monies deposited or received for purposes of the fund shall be accounted for separately, by source and amount, and remain in the fund until appropriated for such purposes.  The fund shall be the repository of all State funds appropriated for affordable housing purposes, including, but not limited to, the proceeds from the receipts of the additional fee collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-7), proceeds from available receipts of the Statewide non-residential development fees collected pursuant to section 35 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.4), monies lapsing or reverting from municipal development trust funds, or other monies as may be dedicated, earmarked, or appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of the fund.  All references in any law, order, rule, regulation, contract, loan, document, or otherwise, to the "Neighborhood Preservation Nonlapsing Revolving Fund" shall mean the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund."  The department shall be permitted to utilize annually up to 7.5 percent of the monies available in the fund for the payment of any necessary administrative costs related to the administration of the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), or any costs related to administration of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.). a.  (1)  Except as permitted pursuant to subsection g. of this section, and by section 41 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-320.1), the commissioner shall award grants or loans from this fund for housing projects and programs in municipalities whose housing elements have received substantive certification from the council, in municipalities receiving State aid pursuant to P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178 et seq.), in municipalities subject to a builder's remedy as defined in section 28 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-328), or in receiving municipalities in cases where the council has approved a regional contribution agreement and a project plan developed by the receiving municipality. (2)  Of those monies deposited into the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" that are derived from municipal development fee trust funds, or from available collections of Statewide non-residential development fees, a priority for funding shall be established for projects in municipalities that have petitioned the council for substantive certification. (3)  Programs and projects in any municipality shall be funded only after receipt by the commissioner of either: (a)  a written statement in support of the program or project from the municipal governing body; or (b)  a written statement in support of the program or project from the municipal clerk, if the municipality has enacted an ordinance pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.  The commissioner shall establish rules and regulations governing the qualifications of applicants, the application procedures, and the criteria for awarding grants and loans and the standards for establishing the amount, terms, and conditions of each grant or loan. c.  For any period which the council may approve, the commissioner may assist affordable housing programs which are not located in municipalities whose housing elements have been granted substantive certification or which are not in furtherance of a regional contribution agreement; provided that the affordable housing program will meet all or part of a municipal low and moderate income housing obligation. d.  Amounts deposited in the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" shall be targeted to regions based on the region's percentage of the State's low and moderate income housing need as determined by the council.  Amounts in the fund shall be applied for the following purposes in designated neighborhoods: (1)  Rehabilitation of substandard housing units occupied or to be occupied by low and moderate income households; (2)  Creation of accessory apartments to be occupied by low and moderate income households; (3)  Conversion of non-residential space to residential purposes; provided a substantial percentage of the resulting housing units are to be occupied by low and moderate income households; (4)  Acquisition of real property, demolition and removal of buildings, or construction of new housing that will be occupied by low and moderate income households, or any combination thereof; (5)  Grants of assistance to eligible municipalities for costs of necessary studies, surveys, plans, and permits; engineering, architectural, and other technical services; costs of land acquisition and any buildings thereon; and costs of site preparation, demolition, and infrastructure development for projects undertaken pursuant to an approved regional contribution agreement; (6)  Assistance to a local housing authority, nonprofit or limited dividend housing corporation, or association or a qualified entity acting as a receiver under P.L.2003, c.295 (C.2A:42-114 et al.) for rehabilitation or restoration of housing units which it administers which: (a) are unusable or in a serious state of disrepair; (b) can be restored in an economically feasible and sound manner; and (c) can be retained in a safe, decent, and sanitary manner, upon completion of rehabilitation or restoration; and (7)  Other housing programs for low and moderate income housing, including, without limitation, (a) infrastructure projects directly facilitating the construction of low and moderate income housing not to exceed a reasonable percentage of the construction costs of the low and moderate income housing to be provided and (b) alteration of dwelling units occupied or to be occupied by households of low or moderate income and the common areas of the premises in which they are located in order to make them accessible to persons with disabilities. e.  Any grant or loan agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall incorporate contractual guarantees and procedures by which the division will ensure that any unit of housing provided for low and moderate income households shall continue to be occupied by low and moderate income households for at least 20 years following the award of the loan or grant, except that the division may approve a guarantee for a period of less than 20 years where necessary to ensure project feasibility. f.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, in making grants or loans under this section, the department shall not require that tenants be certified as low or moderate income or that contractual guarantees or deed restrictions be in place to ensure continued low and moderate income occupancy as a condition of providing housing assistance from any program administered by the department, when that assistance is provided for a project of moderate rehabilitation if the project: (1) contains 30 or fewer rental units; and (2) is located in a census tract in which the median household income is 60 percent or less of the median income for the housing region in which the census tract is located, as determined for a three person household by the council in accordance with the latest federal decennial census.  A list of eligible census tracts shall be maintained by the department and shall be adjusted upon publication of median income figures by census tract after each federal decennial census. g.  In addition to other grants or loans awarded pursuant to this section, and without regard to any limitations on such grants or loans for any other purposes herein imposed, the commissioner shall annually allocate such amounts as may be necessary in the commissioner's discretion, and in accordance with section 3 of P.L.2004, c.140 (C.52:27D-287.3), to fund rental assistance grants under the program created pursuant to P.L.2004, c.140 (C.52:27D-287.1 et al.).  Such rental assistance grants shall be deemed necessary and authorized pursuant to P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), in order to meet the housing needs of certain low income households who may not be eligible to occupy other housing produced pursuant to P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). h.  The department and the State Treasurer shall submit the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" for an audit annually by the State Auditor or State Comptroller, at the discretion of the Treasurer.  In addition, the department shall prepare an annual report for each fiscal year, and submit it by November 30th of each year to the Governor and the Legislature, and the Joint Committee on Housing Affordability, or its successor, and post the information to its web site, of all activity of the fund, including details of the grants and loans by number of units, number and income ranges of recipients of grants or loans, location of the housing renovated or constructed using monies from the fund, the number of units upon which affordability controls were placed, and the length of those controls.  The report also shall include details pertaining to those monies allocated from the fund for use by the State rental assistance program pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2004, c.140 (C.52:27D-287.3) and subsection g. of this section. i.  The commissioner may award or grant the amount of any appropriation deposited in the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" pursuant to section 41 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-320.1) to municipalities pursuant to the provisions of section 39 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.40:55D-8.8). (cf: P.L.2017, c.131, s.200) 1[3.  Section 5 of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.  In order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this act, the agency, in addition to any powers granted to it elsewhere in this act, shall have the following powers: a.  To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business; to adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure; to maintain an office at such place or places within the State as it may designate; to sue and be sued in its own name; b.  To conduct examinations and hearings and to hear testimony and take proof, under oath or affirmation, at public or private hearings, on any matter material for its information and necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; c.  To issue [subpenas] subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers pertinent to any hearing before the agency, or before one or more of the members of the agency appointed by it to conduct a hearing; d.  To apply to any court, having territorial jurisdiction of the offense, to have punished for contempt any witness who refuses to obey a [subpena] subpoena, or who refuses to be sworn or affirmed to testify, or who is guilty of any contempt after summons to appear; e.  To acquire by purchase, gift, foreclosure or condemnation any real or personal property, or any interest therein, to enter into any lease of property and to hold, sell, assign, lease, encumber, mortgage or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, or any interest therein, or mortgage lien interest owned by it or under its control, custody or in its possession and release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption, in property foreclosed by it and to do any of the foregoing by public or private sale, with or without public bidding, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law; f.  To acquire, hold, use and dispose of its income revenues, funds and moneys; g.  To adopt rules and regulations expressly authorized by this act and such additional rules and regulations as shall be necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this act.  The agency shall adopt regulations which provide for consultation with housing sponsors regarding the formulation of agency rules and regulations governing the operation of housing projects and which require the agency to consult with the affected housing sponsor prior to taking any and all specific proposed agency actions relating to the sponsor's housing project.  The agency shall publish all rules and regulations and file them with the Secretary of State; h.  To borrow money or secure credit on a temporary, short-term, interim or long-term basis, and to issue negotiable bonds and to secure the payment thereof and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof; i.  To make and enter into and enforce all contracts and agreements necessary, convenient or desirable to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this act, including contracts or agreements with qualified financial institutions for the servicing and processing of eligible loans owned by the agency; j.  To appoint and employ an executive director, who shall be the chief executive officer of the agency, and additional officers, who need not be members of the agency as the agency deems advisable, and to employ architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts and other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to determine their qualifications, terms of office, duties and compensation; and to promote and discharge such officers, employees and agents, all without regard to the provisions of Title 11 of the Revised Statutes, Civil Service; k.  To contract for and to receive and accept any gifts, grants, loans or contributions from any source, of money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied to carry out the purposes of this act subject to the conditions upon which the grants and contributions may be made, including, but not limited to, gifts or grants from any department or agency of the United States or the State for payment of rent supplements to eligible families or for the payment in whole or in part of the interest expense for a housing project or for any other purpose consistent with this act; l.  To enter into agreements to pay annual sums in lieu of taxes to any political subdivision of the State with respect to any real property owned or operated directly by the agency; m.  To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operations, property and other assets (including eligible loans) in the amounts and from the insurers it deems desirable; n.  To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the agency, to consent to any modification with respect to rate of interest, time and payment of any installment of principal or interest, security or any other terms of any loan to an institutional lender, eligible loan, loan commitment, contract or agreement of any kind to which the agency is a party; o.  To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the agency, to enter into contracts with any housing sponsor containing provisions enabling the housing sponsor to reduce the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular schedule of charges where, by reason of other income or payment from the agency, any department or agency of the United States or the State, these reductions can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of the housing project; p.  To make and collect the fees and charges it determines are reasonable; q.  To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the agency, to invest and reinvest any moneys of the agency not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of any obligations of the agency, in obligations, securities or other investments as the agency deems prudent.  All functions, powers and duties relating to the investment or reinvestment of these funds, including the purchase, sale or exchange of any investments or securities may, upon the request of the agency, be exercised and performed by the Director of the Division of Investment in the Department of the Treasury, in accordance with written directions of the agency signed by an authorized officer, without regard to any other law relating to investments by the Director of the Division of Investment; r.  To provide, contract or arrange for, where, by reason of the financing arrangement, review of the application and proposed construction of a project is required by or in behalf of any department or agency of the United States, consolidated processing of the application or supervision or, in the alternative, to delegate the processing in whole or in part to any such department or agency; s.  To make eligible loans, and to participate with any department, agency or authority of the United States or of any state thereof, this State, a municipality, or any banking institution, foundation, labor union, insurance company, trustee or fiduciary in an eligible loan, secured by a single participating mortgage, by separate mortgages or by other security agreements, the interest of each having equal priority as to lien in proportion to the amount of the loan so secured, but which need not be equal as to interest rate, time or rate of amortization or otherwise, and to undertake commitments to make such loans; t.  To assess from time to time the housing needs of any municipality which is experiencing housing shortages as a result of the authorization of casino gaming and to address those needs when planning its programs; u.  To sell any eligible loan made by the agency or any loan to an institutional lender owned by the agency, at public or private sale, with or without bidding, either singly or in groups, or in shares of loans or shares of groups of loans, issue securities, certificates or other evidence of ownership secured by such loans or groups of loans, sell the same to investors, arrange for the marketing of the same; and to deposit and invest the funds derived from such sales in any manner authorized by this act; v.  To make commitments to purchase, and to purchase, service and sell, eligible loans, pools of loans or securities based on loans, insured or issued by any department or agency of the United States, and to make loans directly upon the security of any such loan, pools of loans or securities; w.  To provide such advisory consultation, training and educational services as will assist in the planning, construction, rehabilitation and operation of housing including but not limited to assistance in community development and organization, home management and advisory services for residents and to encourage community organizations and local governments to assist in developing housing; x.  To encourage research in and demonstration projects to develop new and better techniques and methods for increasing the supply, types and financing of housing and housing projects in the State and to engage in these research and demonstration projects and to receive and accept contributions, grants or aid, from any source, public or private, including but not limited to the United States and the State, for carrying out this purpose; y.  To provide to housing sponsors, through eligible loans or otherwise, financing, refinancing or financial assistance for fully completed, as well as partially completed, projects which may or may not be occupied, if the projects meet all the requirements of this act, except that, prior to the making of the mortgage loans by the agency, said projects need not have complied with sections 7a.(9) and 42 of this act; z.  To encourage and stimulate cooperatives and other forms of housing with tenant participation; aa.  To promote innovative programs for home ownership, including but not limited to lease-purchase programs, employer-sponsored housing programs, and tenant cooperatives; bb.  To set aside and designate, out of the funds that are or may become available to it for the purpose of financing housing in this State pursuant to the terms of this act, certain sums or proportions thereof to be used for the financing of housing and home-ownership opportunities, including specifically lease-purchase arrangements, provided by employers to their employees through nonprofit or limited-dividend corporations or associations created by employers for that purpose; and to establish priority in funding, offer bonus fund allocations, and institute other incentives to encourage such employer-sponsored housing and home-ownership opportunities; cc.  Subject to any agreement with bondholders, to collect, enforce the collection of, and foreclose on any property or collateral securing its eligible loan or loans to institutional lenders and acquire or take possession of such property or collateral and sell the same at public or private sale, with or without bidding, and otherwise deal with such collateral as may be necessary to protect the interests of the agency therein; dd.  To administer and to enter into agreements to administer programs of the federal government or any other entity which are in furtherance of the purposes of this act; ee.  To do and perform any acts and things authorized by this act under, through, or by means of its officers, agents or employees or by contract with any person, firm or corporation; and ff.  To do any acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this act , so long as no duplication of authority or actions negatively impact the efficiency of the programs to produce, manage, or maintain the financial viability of projects. (cf: P.L.1983, c.530, s.5)]1 1[4.] 3.1  Section 6 of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.  a.  The agency, in order to encourage the development, operation, maintenance, construction, improvement and rehabilitation of safe and adequate housing in the State, is hereby authorized and empowered to finance, by the making of eligible loans or otherwise, the construction, improvement or rehabilitation of housing projects in the State. b.  The agency, in order to carry out the purposes of subsection a. of this section, may: (1)  accept applications for loans; (2)  enter into agreements with housing sponsors for permanent loans and temporary loans or advances in anticipation of permanent loans for the development, operation, maintenance, construction, improvement or rehabilitation of housing projects; and (3)  make permanent loans and temporary loans or advances in anticipation of permanent loans to housing sponsors under the provisions of this act. c.  No application for a loan for the construction, improvement or rehabilitation of a housing project containing rental units to be rented at below market rates to be located in any municipality shall be processed unless there is already filed with the secretary of the agency either: (1)  a certified copy of a resolution adopted by the municipality reciting that there is a need for such housing project in the municipality; or (2)  a written statement from the municipal clerk, if the municipality has enacted an ordinance pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), stating that there is a need for such housing project in the municipality. d.  Every application for a loan to a housing sponsor shall be made on forms furnished by the agency and shall contain such information as the agency shall require. e.  In considering any application for a loan for a housing project, the agency shall give first priority to applications for loans for the construction, improvement or rehabilitation of housing projects which will be a part of or constructed in connection with an urban redevelopment program, and also shall give consideration to: (1)  the comparative need of the area to be served by the proposed project for housing; (2)  the ability of the applicant to construct, operate, manage and maintain the proposed housing project; (3)  the existence of zoning or other regulations to protect adequately the proposed housing project against detrimental future uses which could cause undue depreciation in the value of the project; (4)  the availability of adequate parks, recreational areas, utilities, schools, transportation and parking; (5)  the availability of adequate, accessible places of employment; and (6)  where applicable, the eligibility of the applicant to make payments to the municipality in which the housing project is located in lieu of local property taxes. (cf: P.L.1983, c.530, s.6) 1[5.] 4.1  This act shall take effect immediately.